District of Columbia statutes.
2-1207.12

Repealed

Title to property upon dissolution.

Repealed.

June 29, 1984, D.C. Law 5-89, § 13, 31 DCR 2514
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 7, 49 DCR 8140
1981 Ed., § 1-2222.
For temporary (225 day) addition of sections, see §§ 2 to 6 of the Emergency Economic Assistance Temporary Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-74, on March 6, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 2808).
For temporary (90 day) emergency economic assistance to transportation, tourism, restaurant, catering, and lodging industries, see §§ 2 to 6 of Emergency Economic Assistance Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-163, November 2, 2001, 48 DCR 10404), see §§ 2 to 6 of Emergency Economic Assistance Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-260, January 30, 2002, 49 DCR 1433).